Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
BOARD OF TRUSTEES, MEMBERS

§435E-31 Annual report, certificate of
transmittal. The board of trustees shall cause to be recorded with the
commissioner within one hundred twenty days following the end of each fiscal
year, a written statement, executed by a majority of the board of trustees
under penalty of perjury, reciting that each member participating in the
interindemnity arrangement was mailed a copy of the annual financial statement
and quarterly audit certificates by first-class mail, postage prepaid, required
by section 435E-19. [L 1977, c 182, pt of §1; am L 1982, c 203, §16]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next